Nebraska, session 109, LB1081.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1081 LB1081
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Political subdivision means a city, village, county, school
district, public power district, natural resources district, and any
other unit of government below the state level, including any entity
created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public
Agency Act; and
(b) State agency means a department, commission, board, office,
council, authority, or other agency in any branch of state government
that is created by the Constitution of Nebraska or a statute of this
state.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2027, a state agency or political
subdivision of this state shall not use public funds to purchase a flag
of the United States or the State of Nebraska unless the flag has been
one hundred percent manufactured in the United States from articles,
materials, or supplies that have been grown or one hundred percent
produced or manufactured in the United States.
(3) This section shall not apply to the purchase of a hand-held flag
or a flag with dimensions of less than eight inches wide and six inches
high.
Sec. 2. Section 72-2205, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
72-2205 (1) The administrator shall have the authority to develop,
produce, and distribute books, brochures, pictures, slides, postcards,
and other informational or promotional material concerning the State
Capitol. The administrator shall have control over money received from
the distribution of such material and from private or public donations.
Such proceeds and donations shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Capitol Restoration Cash Fund.
(2) The administrator, after receiving advice from the commission,
is authorized to provide facilities for restaurants, cafeterias, or other
services and newsstands for convenience of state officers and employees
-2-

LB1081 LB1081
2026 2026
in the State Capitol when such space is not needed for public use.
Proceeds from the operations and rental of such facilities shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Capitol Restoration
Cash Fund.
(3) The administrator, after receiving advice from the commission,
is authorized to lease, rent, or permit for use as apartments, dwellings,
or offices any or all of the property acquired for future building needs
for the State Capitol and capitol grounds, except that all leases shall
contain the provision that upon notice that such property is needed for
public use, the use or occupancy thereof shall cease. All money received
as rent from such property shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Capitol Restoration Cash Fund and, with interest accrued,
be designated as prescribed in section 72-2211.
(4) The administrator shall see that all parts and apartments of the
State Capitol and capitol grounds are properly ventilated and kept clean
and orderly.
(5) The administrator shall acquire a flag of the United States of
America of suitable and convenient size. The colors of the flag shall be
fast colors, and the cloth shall be of substantial material. The
administrator shall display this flag and the Nebraska State Flag of
similar specifications prominently on State Capitol grounds. The
administrator shall comply with section 1 of this act when acquiring a
flag under this subsection.
(6) The administrator shall ensure that, at proper hours, all
visitors are properly escorted through the State Capitol and over the
capitol grounds, free of expense.
(7) The administrator shall at all times have charge of and
supervision over janitors and other employees in and about the State
Capitol and capitol grounds.
(8) The administrator shall institute, in the name of the state and
with the advice of the Attorney General, civil and criminal proceedings
-3-

LB1081 LB1081
2026 2026
against any person for injury or threatened injury to any public property
in the State Capitol or on the capitol grounds or for committing or
threatening to commit a nuisance therein or thereon.
(9) The administrator shall keep in his or her office a complete
record containing plans, specifications, and surveys of the State Capitol
and capitol grounds and of underground construction thereto.
Sec. 3. Section 79-708, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-708 The governing body of each school shall provide suitable
flags and flagstaffs to carry out the provisions of this section and
section 79-707, and the cost of such flags and flagstaffs shall be paid
from the general operating funds of each school. Governing bodies shall
comply with section 1 of this act when acquiring a flag under this
section.
Sec. 4. Original sections 72-2205 and 79-708, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-4-